Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1399.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6311(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph and subsection (b)(1) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 6311. Persons required to report suspected child abuse.(a) Mandated reporters.--The following adults shall make a report of suspected child abuse, subject to subsection (b), if the person has reasonable cause to suspect that a child is a victim of child abuse:* * *(17) Any adult, paid or unpaid, reasonably expected to have direct contact with children during the production of a film defined in section 1711-D of the act of March 4, 1971 12345678910111213141516171819 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(b) Basis to report.--(1) A mandated reporter enumerated in subsection (a) shall make a report of suspected child abuse in accordance with section 6313 (relating to reporting procedure), if the mandated reporter has reasonable cause to suspect that a child is a victim of child abuse under any of the following circumstances:* * *(ii.1) The mandated reporter comes into contact with the child in the course of the production of a film defined in section 1711-D of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.* * *Section 2. Section 6344(b) introductory paragraph and (b.1) of Title 23 are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6344. Employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents.(a) Applicability.--Beginning December 31, 2014, this section applies to the following individuals:* * *(9) Any adult, paid or unpaid, reasonably expected to have direct contact with children during the production of a film defined in section 1711-D of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.* * * (b) Information to be submitted.--An individual identified in subsection (a)(7) or (8) at the time the individual meets the description set forth in subsection (a)(7) or (8) and an individual identified in subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5)20250HB1399PN1607 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) [or], (6)[,] or (9), (a.1), (a.2) or (a.3) prior to the commencement of employment or service or in accordance with section 6344.4 shall be required to submit the following information to an employer, administrator, supervisor or other person responsible for employment decisions or involved in the selection of volunteers:* * *(b.1) Required documentation to be maintained and produced.--The employer, administrator, supervisor or other person responsible for employment decisions or acceptance of the individual to serve in any capacity identified in subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5)(i) [or], (6)[,] or (9), (a.1) or (a.2) shall maintain a copy of the required information and require the individual to submit the required documents prior to employment or acceptance to serve in any such capacity or as required in section 6344.4, except as allowed under subsection (m).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1399PN1607 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819